New York, session 2025-2026, A3802.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and cited as the "certificate of 2 insurance reliability act (CIRA)". 3 § 2. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 501-a to 4 read as follows: 5 § 501-a. Requirements. Notwithstanding any other law, regulation or 6 rule, every certificate of insurance providing information as to cover- 7 age for activities conducted within the state of New York shall be 8 issued by insurers, and such certificate shall be binding on the insur- 9 er. 10 § 3. Subsection (a) of section 502 of the insurance law, as added by 11 chapter 8 of the laws of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 12 (a) With respect to a certificate of insurance evidencing that a poli- 13 cy provides personal injury liability insurance or property damage 14 liability insurance, as defined in paragraphs thirteen and fourteen of 15 subsection (a) of section one thousand one hundred thirteen of this 16 chapter, no person or governmental entity shall wilfully require, as a 17 condition of awarding a contract for work, or if a contract has already 18 been awarded as a condition for work to commence or continue under the 19 contract, or if the contract has been performed or partially performed 20 as a condition for payment to be made under the contract, the issuance 21 of a certificate of insurance unless the certificate is[: 22 (1)] a form promulgated by the insurer issuing the policy referenced 23 in the certificate of insurance[; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07825-01-5 A. 3802 2 1 (2) a standard certificate of insurance form issued by an industry 2 standard-setting organization and approved for use by the superinten- 3 dent] or any other form approved for use by the superintendent. 4 § 4. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 5 have become a law.